Alabama, session 2026rs, HB88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-6-3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
Page 1

Section 1. Section 32-6-3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
HB88 INTRODUCED
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-3
(a)(1) Every personindividual who applies for an
initial Alabama driver'sdriver license issued by the
Department of Public Safety under this article shall be given
and successfully pass an examination before the issuance of a
driver'sdriver license.
(2) The personindividual seeking a driver license shall
apply toat an ALEA office to take the examination. The
examination shall be conducted by thean officer, state
trooper, or duly authorized third partythird-party testing
agent of the Director of Public SafetyALEA, or one of them
where there is more than one, designated by the Director of
Public Safety to conduct examinations.
(3) A minor shall furnishprovide to ALEA a certified
copy of his or her birth certificate and any other documents
proving identity or authorized presence required by rule
adopted under Section 32-6-13or a certified statement from the
county superintendent of education of the county in which the
minor resides or from the superintendent of the school which
the minor attends proving that the minor is at least 16 years
of age. Upon satisfying this requirement, the minor shall be
examined.
(b)(1) The Director of Public SafetySecretary of ALEA
shall promulgateadopt reasonable rules and regulations not in
conflict with the laws of this state as to the kind of
providing for the examination or test to be given and, the
method and manner of giving the examination, ascertaining, and
Page 2

method and manner of giving the examination, ascertaining, and
HB88 INTRODUCED
reporting the results of the examination, and to who qualifies
to givethe qualifications for giving the examination.
(2) All written, oral, vision, and driving portions of
the examination administered for purposes of obtaining or
renewing a driver license must be in the English language
only. An applicant may not use a translation dictionary, an
electronic device, or an interpreter to assist with the
administration of the examination.
(3) In lieu of examination by the Department of Public
SafetyALEA for the written, oral, vision, and driving portion
of the examination, an applicant currently enrolled or
beginning enrollment in a high school drivers' education class
may submit proof that the applicant has passed the written,
oral, vision, and driving portion of the examination which has
been given by either of the following:
a. A certified driver education instructor at a public
high school who is approved by the State Department of
Education and trained as a third partythird-party testing
agent for the Department of Public SafetyALEA.
b. A driver education instructor at a private high
school who is certified, approved, and trained by the
Department of Public SafetyALEA to act as a third
partythird-party testing agent for the Department of Public
SafetyALEA.
(2)c. In no way shall the State Department of Education
be responsible for the approval and training of private high
school driver education instructors as third partythird-party
testing agents for the Department of Public SafetyALEA.
Page 3

testing agents for the Department of Public SafetyALEA.
HB88 INTRODUCED
(3)(4) Reports of all examinations shall be on forms
provided by the Director of Public Safety and shall indicate
ifThe individual administering the examination shall report to
the Secretary of ALEA whether the applicant passed the
examination. The report shall be on a form provided by ALEA.
(c) If the applicant passes the examination, the
applicant shall be given a certificate to that effect, on a
form provided by the Director of Public SafetyALEA, by the
officer, state trooper, or duly authorized third party testing
agent of the Director of Public Safetyindividual conducting
the examination. The applicant shall present the certificate
to a driver'sdriver license office of the departmentALEA.
(d) If a personthe applicant fails to pass the
examination, no certificate shall be given to the
personapplicant. No application for an initial Alabama
100 driver'sdriver license shall be accepted by a judge of probate
101 or license commissioner.
102 (e)(1) A personAn individual who secures aapplies for
103 the renewal of a driver license in the manner provided by law
104 shall not be required to take the examination again unless the
105 Director of Public SafetySecretary of ALEA deems it advisable
106 to require the personindividual to take the examination, or
107 the individual does not comply with the application deadline
108 provided in Section 32-6-1.
109 (2) If the Director of Public Safety deems it
110 advisablesecretary determines the applicant for renewal must
111 take the examination, the directorsecretary shall notify the
112 personindividual in writing by letter sent to the address
Page 4

personindividual in writing by letter sent to the address
HB88 INTRODUCED
113 given on the application of the personindividual stating the
114 time and place of the examination at least 10 days before the
115 date on which the examination or test is given of the time and
116 place of the examination. The examination given to such a
117 personRenewal examinations shall be conducted in the same
118 manner, and the result of the examination ascertained and
119 reported in the same way, as examinations that are given to
120 personsindividuals applying for an initial Alabama
121 driver'sdriver license.
122 (f) Failure of a personan individual to appear after
123 notice to take such an examination or test, or refusal by a
124 personan individual to take the examination or test, shall be
125 grounds for suspension or revocation of the license of the
126 personindividual by the Director of Public Safety. A personAn
127 individual to whom such an examination or testwho is given an
128 examination whoand fails to pass the examination or test shall
129 have his or her license revoked by the Director of Public
130 Safety."
131 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
132 1, 2026.
Page 5